New York, session 2025-2026, S9688.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The environmental conservation law is amended by adding a 2 new section 37-0508 to read as follows: 3 § 37-0508. Regulation of bisphenol A in business transaction paper. 4 1. Bisphenol A prohibition in business transaction paper. No person, 5 firm, partnership, association, limited liability company or corpo- 6 ration, including banking organizations, shall distribute or use any 7 paper containing bisphenol A for the recording of any business or bank- 8 ing transaction including, but not limited to, receipts, credits, with- 9 drawals, deposits, and credit and debit card records. 10 2. Paper manufacturer responsibilities. a. No paper manufacturer shall 11 produce or distribute any paper containing bisphenol A which is prohib- 12 ited to be used or distributed pursuant to subdivision one of this 13 section. 14 b. Any paper manufacturer that produces paper containing bisphenol A 15 for the purposes referred to in subdivision one of this section shall: 16 (1) not replace bisphenol A with another chemical compound that has 17 been scientifically established to be a known human carcinogen as clas- 18 sified by the United States Environmental Protection Agency, a develop- 19 mental toxin, an endocrine disruptor or a reproductive toxin; 20 (2) use the least toxic alternative chemical compound to replace 21 bisphenol A; 22 (3) provide information on the chemical compound used to replace 23 bisphenol A to the department; and 24 (4) not manufacture such paper until the department shall have certi- 25 fied alternative chemical compounds to bisphenol A based upon the recom- 26 mendations of the advisory committee on least toxic alternatives to 27 bisphenol A. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02638-01-5 S. 9688 2 1 3. Department responsibilities. a. The department shall certify that 2 any chemical compound used to replace bisphenol A in the manufacture of 3 paper pursuant to subdivision two of this section is: 4 (1) the least toxic alternative available; and 5 (2) not a known human carcinogen as classified by the United States 6 Environmental Protection Agency, a developmental toxin, an endocrine 7 disruptor or a reproductive toxin. 8 b. Not less than once every calendar year, the department shall update 9 the requirements for certification of least toxic alternatives to 10 bisphenol A and provide such information to paper manufacturers subject 11 to the provisions of subdivision two of this section. Furthermore, the 12 department shall annually update its information on those chemical 13 compounds that are known human carcinogens, developmental toxins, endoc- 14 rine disrupters or reproductive toxins, and shall provide such informa- 15 tion to paper manufacturers subject to the provisions of subdivision two 16 of this section. The department shall make all information compiled 17 pursuant to this subdivision available to the public on the department's 18 internet website. 19 c. The department shall investigate and determine acceptable methods 20 of disposal and recycling of business transaction paper containing 21 bisphenol A so as to eliminate or minimize exposure to bisphenol A. The 22 department shall provide public notice of the safe practices for handl- 23 ing and disposing of such paper. 24 4. Advisory committee on least toxic alternatives to bisphenol A. a. 25 Within sixty days of the effective date of this section, the department 26 shall convene an advisory panel of experts for the purpose of advising 27 the department on least toxic alternatives to bisphenol A. The names of 28 the members of this committee shall be available on the department's 29 website. 30 b. The advisory committee shall be composed of competent, independent 31 scientists who have no current or past employment or financial conflicts 32 of interest with manufacturers of bisphenol A or products containing 33 bisphenol A. 34 c. Advisory committee members shall have substantial experience in 35 evaluating toxicological and epidemiological data on toxic chemicals, 36 including their potential carcinogenic, endocrine disruptive, reproduc- 37 tive, developmental or neurological effects. Chemicals considered to be 38 toxic shall be those likely to cause or contribute to acute illness or 39 chronic impacts negatively altering human biological functions or abili- 40 ty to respond to environmental assaults. 41 d. The advisory committee shall be convened within sixty days of the 42 effective date of this section and at such times as the department seeks 43 further recommendations or clarifications of current data. All meetings 44 and proceedings of the committee shall be subject to the provisions of 45 article six of the public officers law. 46 § 2. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 47 it shall have become a law.